Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.371

Taxation—Street poll tax.

A second-class city may impose upon and collect from every inhabitant of the city over the age of eighteen years an annual street poll tax not exceeding two dollars and no other road poll tax shall be collected within the limits of the city.

[ 1994 c 81 s 47; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 51; 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 61; 1965 c 7 s 35.24.370. Prior: 1905 c 75 s 1, part; 1890 p 201 s 154; RRS s 9210, part. Formerly RCW 35.24.370.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 292: See note following RCW 26.28.010.